Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1134.
do enact as follows:SB1134,11Section 1. 973.195 (1r) (b) 3. of the statutes is renumbered 973.195 (1r) (b) 3. 2(intro.) and amended to read:SB1134,2,63973.195 (1r) (b) 3. (intro.) A change in law or procedure related to sentencing 4or revocation of extended supervision effective after the inmate was sentenced that 5would have resulted in a one of the following, if the change had been applicable 6when the inmate was sentenced:SB1134,2,77a. A shorter term of confinement in prison or, if.SB1134,3,28c. If the inmate was returned to prison upon revocation of extended 1supervision, a shorter period of confinement in prison upon revocation, if the 2change had been applicable when the inmate was sentenced.SB1134,23Section 2. 973.195 (1r) (b) 3. b. of the statutes is created to read:SB1134,3,44973.195 (1r) (b) 3. b. A shorter term of extended supervision.SB1134,35Section 3. 973.195 (1r) (g) 1. of the statutes is renumbered 973.195 (1r) (g) 1. 6(intro.) and amended to read:SB1134,3,87973.195 (1r) (g) 1. (intro.) If the inmate is serving the term of confinement in 8prison portion of the sentence, a one of the following:SB1134,3,119a. A reduction in the term of confinement in prison by the amount of time 10remaining in the term of confinement in prison portion of the sentence, less up to 1130 days, and a corresponding increase in the term of extended supervision.SB1134,412Section 4. 973.195 (1r) (g) 1. b. of the statutes is created to read:SB1134,3,1313973.195 (1r) (g) 1. b. A reduction in the term of extended supervision.SB1134,514Section 5. 973.195 (1r) (h) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:SB1134,4,215973.195 (1r) (h) 2. If the court adjusts a sentence under par. (g) on the basis of 16a change in law or procedure as provided under par. (b) 3. and the adjusted term of 17extended supervision is greater than the maximum term of extended supervision 18that the offender could have received if the change in law or procedure had been 19applicable when the inmate was originally sentenced or the maximum term of 20extended supervision provided by law for the offense at the time the petition was 21filed, the court may shall reduce the length of the term of extended supervision so 22that the term of extended supervision does not exceed the maximum term of 23extended supervision that the offender could have received if the change in law or 24procedure had been applicable when the inmate was originally sentenced, or the 1maximum term of extended supervision provided by law for the offense at the time 2the petition was filed, whichever is shorter.SB1134,4,33